California, session 20252026, AB1976.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) California’s laws and policies underscore the importance of reducing automobile dependence, and increasing walking, bicycling, and transit use, to create more sustainable, healthy, and affordable communities. However, this mode shift is not yet consistently expressed across, and aligned with, state policies.(2) People who are walking or bicycling are killed or seriously injured in California at much higher rates than drivers and passengers of cars based on their percentage of trips and relative miles traveled, and these disproportionate rates are increasing each year.(3) Underserved communities, including low-income communities and communities of color, lack safe streets, bicycle lanes, and sidewalks. In many cases, underserved communities also lack access to private vehicles, are dependent on shared rides or public transit, or simply lack any reliable transportation options. As a result, these communities experience higher rates of traffic fatalities and serious injuries, chronic disease related to air pollution, and the lack of safe physical activity.(4) Timely delivery of improvements for bicycle, pedestrian, federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), and transit-priority facilities is essential to achieving state safety, climate, equity, and mobility goals. However, duplicative or overly burdensome procedural requirements can unnecessarily delay projects that are designed primarily to enhance safety and accessibility within the existing public right-of-way.(5) State law governing transportation has evolved incrementally over decades, resulting in a patchwork of procedures, enforcement authorities, liability standards, and eligibility requirements that are often inconsistent, outdated, or misaligned with current safety, climate, and equity objectives.(6) Outdated or unnecessarily rigid procedural requirements can delay or prevent the implementation of safety improvements, multimodal infrastructure, pedestrian-oriented public spaces, and community-based transportation programs that are supported by established engineering practice and public policy.(b) It is therefore the intent of the Legislature to align state law with California’s adopted safety, climate, equity, and mobility goals by modernizing statutes governing enforcement, project delivery, public engagement processes, and establishment and management of pedestrian- and bicycle-priority public spaces.SEC. 2. Section 21080.25 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:21080.25. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Affordable housing” means any of the following:(A) Housing that is subject to a recorded covenant, ordinance, or law that restricts rents or sales prices to levels affordable, as defined in Section 50052.5 or 50053 of the Health and Safety Code, to persons and families of moderate, lower, or very low income, as defined in Section 50079.5, 50093, or 50105 of the Health and Safety Code, respectively.(B) Housing that is subject to any form of rent or price control through a public entity’s valid exercise of its police power.(C) Housing that had been occupied by tenants within five years from the date of approval of the development agreement by a primary tenant who was low income and did not leave voluntarily.(2) “Bicycle facilities” includes, but is not limited to, bicycle parking, bicycle sharing facilities, and bikeways as defined in Section 890.4 of the Streets and Highways Code.(3) “High-occupancy vehicle” means a vehicle with three or more occupants.(4) “Highway” means a way or place of whatever nature, publicly maintained and open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel. “Highway” includes a street.(5) “Local agency” means a public transit operator, city, county, city and county, special district, joint powers authority, local or regional transportation agency, or congestion management agency.(6) “Part-time transit lanes” means designated highway shoulders that support the operation of transit vehicles during specified times and are not open to nonpublic transit vehicles at any time.(7) “Pedestrian mall” means a pedestrian mall, as defined in Section 11006 of the Streets and Highways Code, or a pedestrian mall, as defined in Section 12006 of the Streets and Highways Code.(8) “Project labor agreement” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.(9) “Public transit operator” has the same meaning as “operator” in Section 99210 of the Public Utilities Code, or means a public entity that provides contracted paratransit services.(10) “Skilled and trained workforce” has the same meaning as provided in Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.(11) “Transit lanes” means street design elements that delineate space within the roadbed as exclusive to transit use, either full or part time.(12) “Transit prioritization projects” means any of the following transit project types on highways or in the public right-of-way:(A) Signal and sign changes, such as signal coordination, signal timing modifications, signal modifications, or the installation of traffic signs or new signals.(B) The installation of wayside technology and onboard technology.(C) The installation of ramp meters.(D) The conversion to dedicated transit lanes, including transit queue jump or bypass lanes, shared turning lanes and turn restrictions, the narrowing of lanes to allow for dedicated transit lanes or transit reliability improvements, or the widening of existing transit travel lanes by removing or restricting street parking.(E) Transit stop access and safety improvements, including, but not limited to, the installation of bus shelters, lighting, transit bulbs, and the installation of transit boarding landings and islands.(13) “Transportation demand management program” means a specific program of strategies, incentives, and tools to be implemented, including, with specified annual status reporting obligations, to reduce vehicle trips by providing opportunities for the public to choose sustainable travel options, such as transit, bicycle riding, or walking. A specific program of strategies, incentives, and tools includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:(A) Provision of onsite electric vehicle charging stations in excess of applicable requirements.(B) Provision of dedicated parking for car share or zero-emission vehicles, or both types of vehicles, in excess of applicable requirements.(C) Provision of bicycle parking in excess of applicable requirements.(b) This division does not apply to any of the following projects:(1) Pedestrian and bicycle facilities that improve safety, access, or mobility, including new facilities, within the public right-of-way.(2) Projects that improve customer information and wayfinding for transit riders, bicyclists, or pedestrians within the public right-of-way.(3) Transit prioritization projects.(4) A project for the designation and conversion of general purpose lanes to high-occupancy vehicle lanes or bus-only lanes, or highway shoulders to part-time transit lanes, for use either during peak congestion hours or all day on highways with existing public transit service or where a public transit agency will be implementing public transit service as identified in a short-range transit plan.(5) (A) A public project for the protection, improvement, institution, or increase of microtransit, paratransit, shuttle, bus, ferry, bus rapid transit, or light rail service, including the protection, maintenance, construction, operation, or rehabilitation of stops, stations, terminals, or existing operations facilities, which will be exclusively used by zero-emission, near-zero-emission, low oxide of nitrogen engine, compressed natural gas fuel, fuel cell, or hybrid powertrain vehicles, rail or cable cars, rolling stock, or vessels. The project shall be located entirely within an existing public right-of-way or existing highway right-of-way, whether or not the right-of-way is in use for rail or public mass transit and is wholly within the boundaries of an urbanized area or urban cluster, as designated by the United States Census Bureau.(B) A public project otherwise identified in subparagraph (A) shall not apply to the exemption pursuant to this paragraph after January 1, 2032, if used primarily by near-zero-emission, low oxide of nitrogen engine, compressed natural gas fuel, or hybrid powertrain vehicles. This subparagraph shall not apply to a public project otherwise identified in subparagraph (A) used by articulated buses.(C) A public project for the construction or rehabilitation of a ferry terminal that a lead agency has submitted a notice of preparation for an environmental impact report pursuant to Section 21092 before January 1, 2026, shall not apply to the exemption pursuant to this paragraph.(D) A public project for transit services operated by a transportation network company, as defined in Section 5431 of the Public Utilities Code, shall not apply to the exemption pursuant to this paragraph, unless the services are operated by a microtransit provider contracted by the lead agency that uses a managed fleet of multipassenger vehicles dedicated to that service.(6) (A) A public project for the improvement, institution, or increase of passenger rail service, other than light rail service eligible under paragraph (5), including the maintenance, construction, or rehabilitation of stations, terminals, or existing operations facilities, that will be exclusively used by zero-emission trains or certified Tier 4 or cleaner rolling stock or locomotives, as provided in Section 1033.101 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The project shall be located entirely within an existing rail right-of-way or existing highway right-of-way, whether or not the right-of-way is in use for passenger rail transit.(B) A public project otherwise identified in subparagraph (A) shall not be eligible for the exemption pursuant to this paragraph if used by certified Tier 4 or cleaner rolling stock or locomotives that are not zero-emission rolling stock or locomotives and the project is located in an air basin designated as a serious, severe, or extreme nonattainment area for particulate matter and ozone.(7) (A) A public project to construct or maintain infrastructure or facilities to charge, refuel, power, or maintain zero-emission public transit buses, trains, or ferries, provided the project is carried out by a public transit agency and the project is any of the following:(i) Located on property owned, leased, or operated by the local agency.(ii) Located within an existing public right-of-way.(iii) Located on property owned by a public or private utility within an urbanized area.(B) A lead agency applying an exemption pursuant to this paragraph for hydrogen refueling infrastructure or facilities necessary to refuel or maintain zero-emission public transit buses, trains, or ferries shall comply with clauses (i), (iii), and (iv) of subparagraph (D) of, and with subparagraph (E) of, paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).(8) The maintenance, repair, relocation, replacement, or removal of any utility infrastructure associated with a project identified in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive.(9) A project that consists exclusively of a combination of any of the components of a project identified in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive.(10) (A) A project that combines a project identified in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, and a housing development project that is either subject to nondiscretionary approval or is exempt from this division.(B) This paragraph does not exempt the housing development project described in subparagraph (A) from any other applicable requirements under any other law.(11) A planning decision carried out by a local agency to reduce or eliminate minimum parking requirements or institute parking maximums, remove or restrict parking, or implement transportation demand management requirements or programs.(12) The establishment or expansion of a pedestrian mall.(c) Except as provided in subdivision (g), a project exempt from this division under this section shall meet all of the following criteria:(1) (A) A local agency is carrying out the project and is the lead agency for the project.(B) The lead agency shall take an action to approve a project as follows:(i) The lead agency’s governing board shall take an action at a public meeting.(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), if a lead agency has an alternative project approval process for a project subject to subdivision (b), it may instead follow that alternative process.(2) The project does not induce single-occupancy vehicle trips, add additional highway lanes, widen highways, or add physical infrastructure or striping to highways except for minor modifications needed for the efficient and safe movement of transit vehicles, bicycles, or high-occupancy vehicles, such as extended merging lanes, shoulder improvements, or improvements to the roadway within the existing right-of-way. The project shall not include the addition of any auxiliary lanes.(3) The construction of the project shall not require the demolition of affordable housing units.(d) (1) A project that is exempt from this division under this section that is, based on the project engineer’s cost estimate at the time the local agency takes an action pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), anticipated to exceed one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall also meet all of the following criteria:(A) The project is incorporated in a regional transportation plan, sustainable communities strategy, general plan, or other plan that has undergone a programmatic-level environmental review pursuant to this division within 10 years of the approval of the project.(B) The project’s construction impacts are fully mitigated consistent with applicable law.(C) (i) The lead agency shall complete and consider the results of a project business case and a racial equity analysis. The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation may set guidelines for the project business case and the racial equity analysis or delegate that authority to metropolitan planning organizations.(ii) The racial equity analysis required under this subparagraph shall identify the racial equity impacts of the project, identify who will benefit from and be burdened by the project, and, where significant or disproportionate impacts exist, suggest strategies, designs, or actions to mitigate those impacts.(D) The lead agency shall hold noticed public meetings as follows:(i) Before determining that a project is exempt pursuant to this section, the lead agency shall hold at least three noticed public meetings in the project area to hear and respond to public comments.(ii) At least one of the three public meetings shall review the project business case and the racial equity analysis. The review of these documents does not inhibit or preclude application of this section.(iii) The lead agency shall conduct at least two noticed public meetings annually during project construction for the public to provide comments.(iv) The public meetings held pursuant to clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, shall be in the form of either a public community planning meeting held in the project area or in the form of a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing body of the lead agency.(E) The lead agency shall give public notice of the meetings in subparagraph (D) to the last known name and address of all the organizations and individuals that have previously requested notice and shall also give the general public notice using at least one of the following procedures:(i) Publication of the notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the area affected by the project. If more than one area will be affected, the notice shall be published in the newspaper of largest circulation from among the newspapers of general circulation in those areas.(ii) Posting of the notice onsite and offsite in the area where the project is located.(iii) Posting of the notice on the lead agency’s internet website and social media accounts.(2) In addition to the requirements of paragraph (1), for a project described in that paragraph for which at least 50 percent of the project or project’s stops and stations are located in an area that is at risk of residential displacement and that will have a maximum of 15-minute peak headways, the local agency shall complete an analysis of residential displacement and suggest antidisplacement strategies, designs, or actions. For a project subject to this paragraph, the lead agency shall define or identify areas at risk of residential displacement.(3) The amount in paragraph (1) shall be adjusted pursuant to subdivision (j).(e) (1) A project that is exempt from this division under this section that is, based on the project engineer’s cost estimate at the time the local agency takes an action pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), anticipated to exceed fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall also comply with clauses (i), (iii), and (iv) of subparagraph (D) of, and with subparagraph (E) of, paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).(2) The amount in paragraph (1) shall be adjusted pursuant to subdivision (j).(f) (1) (A) Except as provided in subdivision (g), as part of the lead agency’s governing board action pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), the lead agency shall certify that the project will be completed by a skilled and trained workforce.(B) Subparagraph (A) does not apply if the lead agency has an existing policy or certification approved by its governing board that requires the use of a skilled and trained workforce to complete the project if the lead agency is a signatory to a project labor agreement that will require the use of a skilled and trained workforce on the project.(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), for a project that is exempted under this section, the lead agency shall not enter into a construction contract with any entity unless the entity provides to the lead agency an enforceable commitment that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or a contract that falls within an apprenticeship occupation in the building and construction trades in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.(B) Subparagraph (A) does not apply if any of the following requirements are met:(i) The lead agency has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project to use a skilled and trained workforce and the entity has agreed to be bound by that project labor agreement.(ii) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the lead agency before January 1, 2021.(iii) The entity contracted to perform the project entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project to use a skilled and trained workforce.(g) Subdivisions (c) and (f) do not apply to a project described in paragraph (11) of subdivision (b).(h) If the lead agency determines that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section, and the lead agency determines to carry out that project, the lead agency shall file a notice of exemption with the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation and the county clerk of the county in which the project is located in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152.(i) (1) The amendments made to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) by Chapter 987 of the Statutes of 2022 (Senate Bill 922 of the 2021–22 Regular Session) may apply to projects for which a lead agency has filed a notice of exemption under this section before January 1, 2023.(2) For projects for which a lead agency has filed a notice of exemption under this section before January 1, 2023, notwithstanding subdivision (d), as it read on December 31, 2022, the lead agency may certify that the project will be completed by a skilled and trained workforce after the granting of the exemption under this section or the lead agency may demonstrate compliance with subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).(j) (1) Beginning January 1, 2026, and every two years thereafter, the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall adjust the amounts reflected in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) to reflect changes in the Consumer Price Index, as indicated in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, as calculated by the Department of Finance based on the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics data for the most recent odd-numbered year, and publish the updated amounts on its internet website.(2) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision without taking any regulatory action.(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2040, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 992 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, to read:992. (a) (1)A county shall not hold a community input meeting to reconsider, delay, or prevent implementation of a proposed pedestrian or bicycle safety project for a county highway if that project is included in an approved plan that will be implemented as part of the circulation element of the county’s general plan. after the proposed pedestrian or bicycle safety project has passed 90 percent design, as determined by the county based on applicable engineering standards.(2)A county shall not hold a community input meeting after the proposed pedestrian or bicycle safety project has passed 90 percent design, as determined by the county based on applicable engineering standards.(b) (1) Subdivision (a) does not prohibit a county from holding a community input meeting on the design features, aesthetics, and implementation details that do not materially alter the purpose of the proposed pedestrian or bicycle safety project.(2) Subdivision (a) shall not be construed to limit public participation otherwise required by law.(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Community input meeting” means any publicly noticed meeting, workshop, or forum for the sole purpose of receiving input from the general public on a pedestrian or bicycle safety project. “Community input meeting” does not include a meeting of the board of supervisors or other legislative body of the county subject to the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).(2) “Pedestrian or bicycle safety project” means a project intended to improve safety, access, or mobility for pedestrians or bicyclists, including, but not limited to, traffic-calming measures, bicycle facilities, pedestrian facilities, street reconfigurations, signal modifications, and quick-build or pilot projects.(3) “Traffic-calming measure” has the same meaning as that term is used in paragraph (3) of subdivision (i) of Section 21455.9 of the Vehicle Code.SEC. 4. Section 993 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, to read:993. (a) At a public meeting where a contract is awarded After or upon the board of supervisors awarding a contract for, or when it directs county staff are directed to begin, the construction of a pedestrian or bicycle safety project for a county highway, or anytime thereafter, the board of supervisors shall not terminate the project unless the board of supervisors makes at least one of the following findings at a public meeting:(1) The preponderance of the Substantial evidence in the record shows that the specific, identifiable public benefits, including, but not limited to, fiscal constraints, public health impacts, or conflicts with other adopted plans, of not delivering the project outweigh the safety benefit to the community.(2) The preponderance of the Substantial evidence in the record shows that the cost of the safety project cannot be funded given the budget of the county or the budget for the project.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Pedestrian or bicycle safety project” means a project intended to improve safety, access, or mobility for pedestrians or bicyclists, including, but not limited to, traffic-calming measures, bicycle facilities, pedestrian facilities, street reconfigurations, signal modifications, and quick-build or pilot projects.(2) “Terminate” means canceling or materially delaying a project before construction or ordering the removal of an already constructed project. “Terminate” does not include the temporary removal of a pedestrian or bicycle safety project for construction, for upgrades from removal of quick-builds or pilot programs to permanent infrastructure, or programs, removal of a bikeway to upgrade the facility, reconstruction or restriping of a bikeway that maintains its current class, or removal of a pedestrian or bicycle safety project under emergency conditions.(3) “Traffic-calming measure” has the same meaning as that term is used in paragraph (3) of subdivision (i) of Section 21455.9 of the Vehicle Code.SEC. 5. Section 994 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, to read:994. (a) If a board of supervisors establishes a process for residents of the county to submit a petition to request the installation of a traffic-calming measure on a county highway, the board of supervisors shall not require the petition to contain the signatures of more than a majority of the total number of persons whose residences are located, in whole or in part, within 1,000 feet of the proposed traffic-calming measure, as measured along the centerline of a highway or combination of highways.(b) For purposes of this section, “traffic-calming measure” has the same meaning as that term is used in paragraph (3) of subdivision (i) of Section 21455.9 of the Vehicle Code.SEC. 6. Section 1814 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, to read:1814. (a) (1)A city shall not hold a community input meeting to reconsider, delay, or prevent implementation of a proposed pedestrian or bicycle safety project for a street or highway if that project is included in an approved plan that will be implemented as part of the circulation element of the city’s general plan. after the proposed pedestrian or bicycle safety project has passed 90 percent design, as determined by the city based on applicable engineering standards.(2)A city shall not hold a community input meeting after the proposed pedestrian or bicycle safety project has passed 90 percent design, as determined by the city based on applicable engineering standards.(b) (1) Subdivision (a) does not prohibit a city from holding a community input meeting on the design features, aesthetics, and implementation details that do not materially alter the purpose of the proposed pedestrian or bicycle safety project.(2) Subdivision (a) shall not be construed to limit public participation otherwise required by law.(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Community input meeting” means any publicly noticed meeting, workshop, or forum for the sole purpose of receiving input from the general public on a pedestrian or bicycle safety project. “Community input meeting” does not include a meeting of the city council or other legislative body of the city subject to the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).(2) “Pedestrian or bicycle safety project” means a project intended to improve safety, access, or mobility for pedestrians or bicyclists, including, but not limited to, traffic-calming measures, bicycle facilities, pedestrian facilities, street reconfigurations, signal modifications, and quick-build or pilot projects.(3) “Traffic-calming measure” has the same meaning as that term is used in paragraph (3) of subdivision (i) of Section 21455.9 of the Vehicle Code.SEC. 7. Section 1815 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, to read:1815. (a) At a public meeting where a contract is awarded After or upon the legislative body of a city awarding a contract for, or when the legislative body directs city staff are directed to begin, the construction of a pedestrian or bicycle safety project for a street or highway, or anytime thereafter, the legislative body of a city shall not terminate the project unless the legislative body makes at least one of the following findings at a public meeting:(1) The preponderance of the Substantial evidence in the record shows that the specific, identifiable public benefits, including, but not limited to, fiscal constraints, public health impacts, or conflicts with other adopted plans, of not delivering the project outweigh the safety benefit to the community.(2) The preponderance of the Substantial evidence in the record shows that the cost of the safety project cannot be funded given the budget of the city or the budget for the project.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Pedestrian or bicycle safety project” means a project intended to improve safety, access, or mobility for pedestrians or bicyclists, including, but not limited to, traffic-calming measures, bicycle facilities, pedestrian facilities, street reconfigurations, signal modifications, and quick-build or pilot projects.(2) “Terminate” means canceling or materially delaying a project before construction or ordering the removal of an already constructed project. “Terminate” does not include the temporary removal of a pedestrian or bicycle safety project for construction, for upgrades from removal of quick-builds or pilot programs to permanent infrastructure, or programs, removal of a bikeway to upgrade the facility, reconstruction or restriping of a bikeway that maintains its current class, or removal of a pedestrian or bicycle safety project under emergency conditions.(3) “Traffic-calming measure” has the same meaning as that term is used in paragraph (3) of subdivision (i) of Section 21455.9 of the Vehicle Code.SEC. 8. Section 1816 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, to read:1816. (a) If the legislative body of a city establishes a process for residents of the city to submit a petition to request the installation of a traffic-calming measure on a street or highway, the legislative body shall not require the petition to contain the signatures of more than a majority of the total number of persons whose residences are located, in whole or in part, within 1,000 feet of the proposed traffic-calming measure, as measured along the centerline of a street or highway or combination of streets and highways.(b) For purposes of this section, “traffic-calming measure” has the same meaning as that term is used in paragraph (3) of subdivision (i) of Section 21455.9 of the Vehicle Code.SEC. 9.Part 2 (commencing with Section 12000) is added to Division 13 of the Streets and Highways Code, to read:2.Pedestrian Mall Law of 20261.General Provisions and Definitions12000.This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Pedestrian Mall Law of 2026.12001.Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions contained in this chapter shall govern the construction of this part.12002.“City” includes every county, city, and city and county within this state. “The city” means the particular county, city, or city and county, acting pursuant to this part.12003.“City street,” as used with regard to streets located within a city or city and county, means a street located within the city or city and county, except a freeway or county highway, as defined in Sections 23.5 and 25. “City street,” as used with regard to streets located within a county, means a street located within the county, except a freeway, as defined in Section 23.5.12004.“Improvements” include, but are not limited to, paving, sidewalks, curbs, gutters, sewers, drainage works, street lighting facilities, fire protection facilities, flood protection facilities, water distribution facilities, retaining walls, landscaping, tree planting, statuary, fountains, decorative structures, benches, restrooms, childcare facilities, display facilities, information booths, public assembly facilities, improvements necessary or convenient for a covered air-conditioned mall, and other structures, works, or improvements necessary or convenient to serve members of the public using the applicable pedestrian mall, including the reconstruction or relocation of existing city-owned works and improvements or facilities on the city streets. “Improvement” does not include vehicular parking facilities.12005.“Legislative body” means the legislative body of the city.12006.“Pedestrian mall” means one or more “city streets,” or portions thereof, on which vehicular traffic is or is to be restricted in whole or in part and which is or is to be used exclusively or primarily for pedestrian travel.12007.“Street” means any public street, road, highway, alley, lane, court, way, or place of any nature open to the use of the public.2.Purposes and Powers12100.The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:(a)In certain areas of cities in the state, there is a need to separate pedestrian travel from vehicular travel.(b)That separation is necessary to support local commerce, promote civic gatherings, encourage cultural activities, protect the public safety, or otherwise serve the public interest and convenience.(c)That objective can, in part, be accomplished by the establishment of pedestrian malls pursuant to this part.12101.A legislative body may do all of the following:(a)Establish pedestrian malls.(b)Prohibit, in whole or in part, vehicular traffic on a pedestrian mall.(c)Construct on city streets that have been or will be established as a pedestrian mall improvements of any kind or nature necessary or convenient to the operation of the city streets as a pedestrian mall.(d)Pay, from general funds of the city or any other available moneys, the whole or any portion of the cost of improvements constructed pursuant to subdivision (c).(e)To do any and all other acts or things necessary or convenient for the accomplishment of the purposes of this part.12102.A city may not establish a pedestrian mall on a state highway pursuant to Section 12200 until the city receives approval from the department pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12300).12103.(a)(1)A legislative body may acquire, by gift, purchase, eminent domain, or otherwise, land, real property, or rights-of-way that will become part of a city street established as a pedestrian mall or that will otherwise be used by the city as part of, or for purposes connected with, a pedestrian mall.(2)Land, real property, or rights-of-way acquired pursuant to paragraph (1) may be improved in the same manner as city streets may be improved pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 12101.(b)A legislative body may make improvements on city streets adjacent to the pedestrian mall where those improvements are necessary or convenient to the operation of the mall.12104.The powers granted pursuant to this part to prohibit, in whole or in part, vehicular traffic on a city street shall be in addition to, and not limited by, the powers granted by Section 21101 of the Vehicle Code or by any other law.12105.(a)This part shall be liberally construed to the end that its purpose may be effective.(b)This part does not affect any other law relating to the same or similar subject, but provides an alternative procedure for the subject to which it relates. When proceedings are taken under this part, its provisions only shall apply. The Special Assessment Investigation, Limitation and Majority Protest Act of 1931 (Division 4 (commencing with Section 2800)) shall not apply to any proceedings taken under any other law for the improvement of a pedestrian mall.3.Establishment and Improvement of a Pedestrian Mall12200.A legislative body may adopt, following a public hearing, a resolution or ordinance to establish a pedestrian mall if it determines that the public interest and convenience requires the establishment of the pedestrian mall. The resolution or ordinance shall contain all of the following:(a)The following findings:(1)A determination that the closure or traffic restriction leaves a sufficient portion of the streets in the surrounding area for other public uses, including vehicular, pedestrian, and bicycle traffic.(2)A determination that the closure will create a public benefit to local commerce, civic gatherings, cultural activities, public safety, or otherwise serve the public interest and convenience.(b)A general description of the pedestrian mall, including the city streets, or portions of city streets, that are to be established as a pedestrian mall.(c)Rules and regulations prohibiting vehicular traffic, in whole or in part, on the pedestrian mall. If vehicular traffic is proposed to be prohibited only in part, the resolution or ordinance shall also contain a general statement of the exceptions proposed to be made. The resolution or ordinance may include any of the following exceptions:(1)Exceptions in favor of public, emergency, utility, and other classes of vehicles.(2)Exceptions in favor of all or certain classes of vehicles during certain days or during portions of days.(3)Exceptions of any other kind or nature.(d)Any additional rules and regulations pertaining to the interpretation, operation, and enforcement of the rules and regulations described in subdivision (c), and otherwise pertaining to the use, operation, maintenance, and control of the pedestrian mall.12201.The city shall provide notice of the public hearing described in Section 12200 in accordance with Chapter 2.7 (commencing with Section 65090) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.12202.(a)A city may initiate the process to establish a pedestrian mall or may initiate the process following an application by a business, educational institution, or other entity.(b)Receipt of an application pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not obligate a city to initiate the process to establish a pedestrian mall.12203.(a)If, in connection with the initial establishment of a pedestrian mall, a legislative body proposes to make any improvements, the resolution or ordinance described in Section 12200 shall also contain all of the following:(1)A general description of the improvements proposed to be made. The description may be made in any manner permitted or provided in any law under which the improvements are to be made or financed.(2)A general statement of the source or sources of moneys proposed to be used to pay the costs and expenses of the improvements.(3)If all or any part of the improvements are proposed to be made or financed under the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000)), the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000)), or similar special assessment law, a statement as to what law is proposed to be used.(b)A legislative body may allow private businesses use of the pedestrian mall and may allow those private businesses to make improvements to the pedestrian mall.12204.A legislative body shall install and maintain signage that clearly designates the boundaries of the pedestrian mall and related improvements and that clearly states the applicable restriction on the use of vehicles within the pedestrian mall.12205.(a)Before the adoption of the resolution or ordinance pursuant to Section 12200, a legislative body may allow a pilot or phased pedestrian mall project pursuant to any other law that permits temporary street closures, including, but not limited to, Section 21101 of the Vehicle Code.(b)If a pilot or phased pedestrian mall project is proposed pursuant to subdivision (a) for establishment on a state highway, the legislative body shall obtain approval from the department before allowing the project.12206.(a)A legislative body may only expand, reduce, or rescind a pedestrian mall upon adoption of a resolution or ordinance, after a public meeting, on the matter, and, if the pedestrian mall is located on a state highway, upon approval by the department.(b)(1)The act of rescinding a pedestrian mall does not require a city to return the street to its prior condition unless the pedestrian mall is located on a state highway and the department requires otherwise pursuant to an agreement entered into pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12300).(2)If the pedestrian mall is located on a state highway, the department may require periodic review of the pedestrian mall to evaluate its impacts on safety, mobility, and local access.12207.The establishment of a pedestrian mall is consistent with the public access requirements of the California Coastal Act of 1976 (Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000) of the Public Resources Code).4.Pedestrian Malls on State Highways12300.(a)A city in which a state highway is located may initiate a request to establish a pedestrian mall on that state highway, or a portion of that state highway, pursuant to this chapter.(b)A request pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be initiated by adoption of a resolution of the legislative body of the city.(c)A request may be initiated by the legislative body of the city on its own motion or following receipt of an application by a business, business improvement district, educational institution, or other entity.(d)Receipt of an application shall not obligate the legislative body to initiate a request.12301.(a)A state highway, or portion of a state highway, shall not be established as a pedestrian mall pursuant to this chapter unless the legislative body finds, and the department concurs, that the state highway functions as a main street.(b)For purposes of this section, “main street” means a segment of a state highway that primarily serves local access, commerce, or community activity.12302.(a)Upon adoption of a resolution pursuant to Section 12300, the legislative body may submit a formal request to the department to approve the establishment of the pedestrian mall.(b)The request shall include all of the following information:(1)A general description of the proposed pedestrian mall, including the affected segment of the state highway.(2)The findings required pursuant to Section 12200.(3)A traffic analysis demonstrating that the proposed closure or restriction will not unreasonably impede regional or intercity travel and that sufficient alternative routes exist.(4)A description of proposed improvements, if any.(5)A description of how emergency access, transit operations, and goods movement will be maintained or accommodated.(6)Any other information required by the department.12303.(a)The department may approve, approve with conditions, or deny a request submitted pursuant to Section 12302.(b)The department may adopt guidelines to determine the process for approving or denying a request to establish a pedestrian mall on a state highway.(c)The department may impose reasonable conditions on an approval, including conditions related to design, operations, maintenance, and ongoing performance monitoring.12304.(a)Following approval by the department, the legislative body may adopt a resolution or ordinance pursuant to Section 12200 to establish the pedestrian mall.(b)The resolution or ordinance shall be consistent with any conditions imposed by the department pursuant to this chapter.12305.(a)The city shall be responsible for the design, construction, operation, and maintenance of the pedestrian mall and any related improvements, unless otherwise agreed to by the department.(b)The department may enter into an agreement with the city to define roles and responsibilities, including maintenance, liability, and costs.12306.This chapter shall not be construed to limit or supersede the authority of the department over the state highway system.SEC. 10.The Legislature finds and declares that Sections 6 to 8, inclusive, of this act adding Sections 1814, 1815, and 1816 to the Streets and Highways Code address a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Sections 6 to 8, inclusive, of this act apply to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 9. The Legislature finds and declares that providing a standardized process for approving pedestrian or bicycle safety projects is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Sections 6 to 8, inclusive, of this act adding Sections 1814, 1815, and 1816 to the Streets and Highways Code apply to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 11.SEC. 10. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.